Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5467.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 165. If a candidate of a political party for the office of state senator or state representative, as applicable, after having qualified as a candidate, dies after the last day for qualifying as a candidate and more than 55 days before the date of the primary election, leaving the political party without a candidate for the office of state senator or state representative, a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy caused by the death may be selected by 3 delegates elected by a majority of the precinct delegates and nominees for state representative and state senator of the candidate's political party from within the senatorial or representative district. However, if the senatorial or representative district comprises more than 1 county, the meeting shall must be called and conducted by the chairperson of the state central committee or his or her the chairperson's authorized representative. The name of the replacement candidate selected under this subsection shall must be transmitted to the county officials required by law to print and distribute ballots. The Not less than 55 days before the date of the primary election, the county officials shall print the name of the replacement candidate selected under this section on the ballot in place of the deceased candidate. , or if the ballots are already printed, have the ballots reprinted with the candidate's name on the ballots and the reprinted ballots shall be distributed to the various voting precincts within their respective county. Sec. 169. When If the candidate of a political party, after having been nominated to the office of state senator or representative, shall die, be dies, is certified by a state convention for a statewide office, withdraw withdraws from the district, become becomes physically unfit, or become becomes disqualified for any reason, more than 55 days before the date of the election for that office, the members residing within said the senatorial or representative district of the county executive committees of such the candidate's political party for the counties comprising said the senatorial or representative district shall meet at a time and place designated by the chairperson of the state central committee of such the political party and notice of such the meeting shall must be sent to all such the members of the county executive committees. The meeting shall must be conducted by the secretary of the state central committee or his or her the secretary's duly authorized agent, but said the secretary or agent shall is not be privileged to vote at such the meeting. A replacement candidate to fill the vacancy shall must be selected by a majority vote of the committee members present and voting : Provided, That if such not less than 55 days before the date of the election. If the vacancy occurs in a senatorial or representative district wholly within 1 county, a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy shall must be selected by the county executive committee of the county by a majority vote thereof. of the county executive committee of the county not less than 55 days before the date of the election. The name of the replacement candidate so selected shall must be certified immediately by the chairperson and the secretary of said the committee to the secretary of state in those districts comprising 2 or more counties and to the county clerk in those districts contained within 1 county. The certification shall must be sent in any case to the board of election commissioners for each county , whose duty it is to prepare the official ballots. ; and said Not less than 55 days before the date of the election, the board shall cause to be printed or placed upon such on the ballots, in the proper place, the name of the replacement candidate so selected and certified to fill such the vacancy. Sec. 195. If a candidate of a political party for prosecuting attorney, sheriff, county clerk, county treasurer, register of deeds, drain commissioner, coroner, or surveyor, after having qualified as a candidate, dies after the last day for qualifying and more than 55 days before the date of the primary election, leaving the political party without a candidate for that office, a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy may be selected by the members of the county committee of the candidate's political party, and the name of the replacement candidate selected shall must be transmitted to the county officials required by law to print and distribute ballots. The Not less than 55 days before the date of the primary election, the name of the replacement candidate shall must be printed on the ballots. , but if the ballots have been printed, the county officials shall have the ballots reprinted with the candidate's name on the ballots and the reprinted ballots shall be distributed to the various voting precincts within their respective counties. Sec. 198. (1) If a candidate of a political party files a nominating petition or filing fee for a county office and has been nominated for the office by a political party, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she has moved the candidate moves from the county or has become becomes physically unfit. (2) If a candidate of a political party files a nominating petition or filing fee for the office of county commissioner and has been nominated for that office by a political party, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless he or she has moved the candidate moves from the county or from the district from which he or she the candidate was nominated or has become becomes physically unfit. (3) If the person an individual who has been nominated as the candidate of a political party for a county office or the office of county commissioner dies more than 55 days before the date of the election for that office, the county executive committee of the political party whose candidate has died shall select, by majority vote, a replacement candidate for that person. individual. The name of the replacement candidate selected shall must be transmitted to the election officials responsible for the preparation and distribution of ballots, and, not less than 55 days before the date of the election, the name of the replacement shall candidate must be affixed to each ballot in place of the name of the original candidate. (4) A vacancy shall must not be filled by a county executive committee except as provided in this section. (5) This prohibition shall must not be construed to prohibit the withdrawal of a candidate who was nominated without having filed a nominating petition or filing fee and whose name has been written or placed on the ballot of a political party. Sec. 255. If a candidate of a political party for the office of county road commissioner, after having qualified as a candidate, dies after the last day for qualifying and more than 55 days before the date of the primary election, leaving the political party without a candidate for the office of county road commissioner, a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy may be selected by the members of the county committee of the candidate's political party for the county, and the name of the replacement candidate selected shall must be transmitted to the county officials required by law to print and distribute ballots. The Not less than 55 days before the date of the primary election, the name of the replacement candidate shall must be printed on the ballots. , but if the ballots have been printed, the county officials shall have the ballots reprinted with the candidate's name on the ballots and the reprinted ballots shall be distributed to the various voting precincts within their respective county. Sec. 260. When the If a candidate of a political party, after having been nominated to the office of county road commissioner, shall die, withdraw, remove dies, withdraws, moves from the county, or become becomes disqualified for any reason, more than 55 days before the date of the election for the office of county road commissioner, the county committee of such the political party shall meet forthwith not less than 55 days before the date of the election and, by a majority vote of the members thereof, shall of the county committee, select a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy. thereby caused. The name of the replacement candidate so selected shall must be immediately certified by the chairman chairperson and the secretary of said the county committee to the county clerk and to the board of county election commissioners , whose duty it is to prepare the official ballots. and who Not less than 55 days before the date of the election, the board of county election commissioners shall cause to be printed or placed upon such on the ballots, in the proper place, the name of the replacement candidate so selected to fill such the vacancy. Sec. 352. If a candidate of a political party for a township office, after having qualified as a candidate, dies after the last day for qualifying and more than 55 days before the date of the primary election for that office, leaving the political party without a candidate for a township office, a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy may be selected by the members of the county executive committee of the candidate's political party residing in the township if 3 or more members of the county executive committee of that political party reside in the township. If less than 3 members of the county executive committee of that political party reside in the township, the county executive committee of that political party may select a replacement candidate to fill the vacancy for that office. The name of the replacement candidate selected shall must be transmitted to the township officials required by law to print and distribute ballots. The Not less than 55 days before the date of the primary election, the name of the replacement candidate shall must be printed on the ballots. , but if the ballots have been printed, the township officials shall have the ballots reprinted with the candidate's name on the ballots and the reprinted ballots shall be distributed to the various voting precincts within the township. Sec. 357. If a candidate of a political party, after having been nominated for a township office, dies, moves from the township, or becomes disqualified for any reason, more than 55 days before the date of the election for that office, the township board of election commissioners shall provide a blank space or spaces on the official ballots that affords every elector of the political party an opportunity to vote for a candidate to fill the vacancy by writing in the name of his or her the elector's selection.